Indiana, session 2026, SB135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-106 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 106. (a) "Incinerator",
for purposes of IC 13-21 and environmental management laws, means
an engineered apparatus designed for the burning of solid waste under
the effect of controls on the following:
(1) Temperature.
(2) Retention time.
(3) Air.
(4) Other combustion factors.
(b) The term does not include a disposal plant performing
alkaline hydrolysis in compliance with IC 15-17-11.
SECTION 2. IC 13-11-2-212, AS AMENDED BY P.L.54-2023,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 212. (a) "Solid waste processing facility", for
purposes of IC 13-19-3-8.2, IC 13-19-4, IC 13-20-1, IC 13-20-4, and
IC 13-20-6, and subject to subsection (b), means a facility at which at
least one (1) of the following is located:
2026 IN 135—LS 6450/DI 150


(1) A solid waste incinerator.
(2) A transfer station.
(3) A solid waste baler.
(4) A solid waste shredder.
(5) A resource recovery system.
(6) A composting facility.
(7) A garbage grinding system.
(8) A medical or an infectious waste treatment facility.
(9) A solid waste solidification facility that is not located on an
operating, permitted landfill.
(10) A facility that uses plasma arc or another source of heat to
treat solid waste.
(b) The term "solid waste processing facility" does not include the
following:
(1) A facility or operation that generates solid waste.
(2) An advanced recycling facility.
(3) A disposal plant performing alkaline hydrolysis in
compliance with IC 15-17-11.
SECTION 3. IC 13-18-3-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The department shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to establish:
(1) wastewater;
(2) effluent; and
(3) discharge;
standards for alkaline hydrolysis chambers used for the disposal of
animal remains under IC 15-17-11.
(b) Rules adopted under this section must do the following:
(1) Distinguish alkaline hydrolysis from combustion-based
disposal methods.
(2) Establish requirements for neutralization, storage, land
application, or discharge.
(3) Identify when a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination
System permit is required.
(4) Provide a streamlined registration or permit pathway for
small-volume veterinary or agricultural systems.
SECTION 4. IC 15-17-2-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. "Alkaline hydrolysis" means the dissolution of
animal remains by:
(1) placing the animal remains in water and a chemical
solution that includes:
2026 IN 135—LS 6450/DI 150


(A) potassium hydroxide;
(B) sodium hydroxide; or
(C) a combination of potassium hydroxide and sodium
hydroxide; and
(2) introducing heat and pressure to breakdown the animal
remains to only:
(A) bone fragments that may be pulverized; and
(B) a sterile liquid effluent;
that are suitable for lawful disposal.
SECTION 5. IC 15-17-2-2.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.6. "Alkaline hydrolysis chamber" means an
enclosed space that is:
(1) specifically created for alkaline hydrolysis; and
(2) able to be completely sealed during alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 6. IC 15-17-11-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. A licensee that operates a
disposal plant in compliance with this chapter may dispose of
animal remains in one (1) of the following methods:
(1) Burial.
(2) Incineration.
(3) Rendering.
(4) Composting.
(5) Alkaline hydrolysis.
(6) Any other method approved by the state veterinarian that
protects public and animal health.
SECTION 7. IC 15-17-11-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) A licensee that performs
alkaline hydrolysis for the disposal of animal remains shall:
(1) construct, install, and operate the alkaline hydrolysis
chamber in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter;
(2) prevent the release of pathogens into the environment;
(3) maintain secure handling of the animal remains;
(4) manage effluent consistent with department of
environmental management requirements; and
(5) maintain records of:
(A) intake;
(B) processing; and
(C) final disposition;
as required by the board.
2026 IN 135—LS 6450/DI 150


(b) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section. Rules adopted under this chapter must include the
following:
(1) Minimum equipment requirements.
(2) Biosecurity procedures.
(3) Operator training.
(4) Emergency shutdown and containment procedures.
(5) Acceptable methods for handling residual bone material.
(c) A facility that performs alkaline hydrolysis under this
chapter is not considered:
(1) an incinerator (as defined in IC 13-11-2-106);
(2) a crematory (as defined in IC 23-14-31-11); or
(3) a medical waste processor;
for purposes of IC 36-7-4 (zoning) or any local ordinance.
SECTION 8. IC 36-7-4-1109.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1109.6. A unit may regulate the
location of a disposal plant performing alkaline hydrolysis in
compliance with IC 15-17-11 but may not do the following:
(1) Classify the facility as an incinerator or a crematory.
(2) Impose zoning requirements more restrictive than those
applied to comparable veterinary or agricultural
waste-handling facilities.
2026 IN 135—LS 6450/DI 150